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DTC 63(2) Shift Solenoid B Electrical (S2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
See page DI−135.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

63(2)

The Engine & ECT ECU checks for an open or short circuit in
theshift solenoidvalveS2circuitwhen it changes. (1 −trip
detection logic)
The Engine & ECT ECU records DTC 63(2) if condition (a) or
(b) is detected once, but it does not light up check engine
warning light.
After Engine & ECT ECU detects condition (a) or (b) continu-
ously8 timesormore inone −trip, it causes thecheckengine
warning light light up until condition (a) or (b) disappears.
After that, if the Engine & ECT ECU detects condition (a) or (b)
once, it starts lighting up check engine warning light again.

(a)Solenoid resistance is8 � or less (short circuit)when the
solenoid is energized.
(b)Solenoid resistance is100k � ormore (opencircuit)when
the solenoid is not energized.

SOpenorshort inshift solenoidvalveS2circuit
SShift solenoidvalveS2
SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between S2 of transmission wire connec-
tor and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal S2 and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
tor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals S2 and E1 of Engine
and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).
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3 Check shift solenoid valve S2.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve S2.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
m inal and t he bat t er y negat ive lead t o t he s olenoid body
ground.
OK:

Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve S2
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


